Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-568
Employment of special engineer.

The mayor and council or board of trustees may, when they deem it expedient, employ a special engineer to make, or assist in making, any estimate necessary or to perform any other duty provided for in section 17-568.01. Any work executed by such special engineer shall have the same validity and serve in all respects as though executed by the city or village engineer.

Laws 1879, § 20, p. 197;

R.S.1913, § 5011;

Laws 1921, c. 183, § 1, p. 695;

C.S.1922, § 4180;

Laws 1925, c. 51, § 1, p. 202;

C.S.1929, § 17-119;

Laws 1943, c. 25, § 1, p. 118;

R.S.1943, § 17-568;

Laws 1949, c. 25, § 1(1), p. 98;

Laws 1951, c. 33, § 1, p. 133;

Laws 1983, LB 304, § 3.

1. Estimate of expenditures

2. Miscellaneous

1. Estimate of expenditures

Estimate of proposed improvement and advertisement for bids are jurisdictional requirements. Musser v. Village of Rushville, 122 Neb. 128, 239 N.W. 642 (1931).

Where engineer submits an estimate stating "cost not to exceed $16,500.00", the failure of engineer to state a definite amount was at most an irregularity, and such estimate served the statutory purpose. Carr v. Fenstermacher, 119 Neb. 172, 228 N.W. 114 (1929).

The failure to state amount of estimate in published notice for bids will not vitiate the whole proceeding in a collateral attack. Wookey v. City of Alma, 118 Neb. 158, 223 N.W. 953 (1929).

Where municipality has no city engineer to make estimates, a city may secure such necessary services of a competent engineer. Howe v. City of Auburn, 110 Neb. 184, 193 N.W. 352 (1923); Schreifer v. City of Auburn, 110 Neb. 179, 193 N.W. 350 (1923); Diederich v. City of Red Cloud, 103 Neb. 688, 173 N.W. 698 (1919).

Estimate may be upon the unit plan, and may be based on the existing freight rates on material to be used with the provision that if such rates be advanced or lowered, the estimate should be correspondingly increased or lowered. State ex rel. City of McCook v. Marsh, 107 Neb. 637, 187 N.W. 84 (1922).

The provision that the estimate shall be published with the advertisement for bids and no contract shall be let for a price exceeding such estimate cannot be evaded by raising the estimate after the bids have been opened. Murphy v. City of Plattsmouth, 78 Neb. 163, 110 N.W. 749 (1907).

The power to bind a city by contract depends among other things upon an estimate having been first made and submitted to the council by the city engineer which provision is mandatory. City of Plattsmouth v. Murphy, 74 Neb. 749, 105 N.W. 293 (1905).

2. Miscellaneous

A city may ratify an irregular contract made with a special engineer, if the city had the power to contract in first instance. Morearty v. City of McCook, 117 Neb. 113, 219 N.W. 839 (1928).

This section does not apply to construction of temporary sidewalks on ungraded and unimproved streets. Whitla v. Connor, 114 Neb. 526, 208 N.W. 670 (1926).